Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-606
Corporate offenders; how served; prosecution of agents or employees.

In case of a violation of the Game Law by a corporation, the warrant of arrest may be served on the president, secretary, or manager in this state or on any general or local agent thereof in the county where the action may properly be brought, and upon the return of such warrant so served, the corporation shall be deemed in court and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, and any fine imposed may be collected by execution against the property of such corporation. This section shall not be deemed to exempt from prosecution any agent or employee whose personal guilt is supported by probable cause.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 13, p. 436;

C.S.1929, § 37-613;

R.S.1943, § 37-613;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 42;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-613;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 296.